Colorado, session 2026A, HB1266.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-38.5-301, repeal
(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(d), and (2) as follows:
24-38.5-301. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
hereby finds and declares that:
(a) Retail deliveries are increasing and are expected to continue
to increase in urban and rural communities;
(b) The motor vehicles used to make retail deliveries are some of
the most polluting vehicles on the road, which has resulted in additional
and increasing air and greenhouse gas pollution at the local community
level from idling delivery vehicles in neighborhoods;
(c) The adverse environmental and health impacts of increased
local emissions from motor vehicles used to make retail deliveries can be
mitigated and offset by investing in the charging and fueling
infrastructure needed to support widespread public adoption of electric
motor vehicles and zero emission vehicles and by replacing the state's
dirtiest passenger vehicles with zero emission vehicles;
(d) Instead of reducing the impacts of retail deliveries by limiting
retail delivery activity through regulation, it is more appropriate to
continue to allow persons who receive retail deliveries to benefit from the
convenience afforded by unfettered retail deliveries and instead impose
a small fee on each retail delivery and use fee revenue to fund necessary
mitigation activities;
-2- HB26-1266

(2) The general assembly further finds and declares that:
(a) To incentivize, support, and accelerate the construction of
electric motor vehicle charging and fueling infrastructure in communities
throughout the state; incentivize, support, and accelerate the adoption of
electric motor vehicles by businesses, including transportation network
companies, governmental entities, and individuals; and thereby increase
access to electric motor vehicles, minimize and mitigate the
environmental and health impacts caused by transportation-related
emissions of air pollutants and greenhouse gases, and allow the state and
its citizens to reap the environmental, health, business and governmental
operational efficiency, and personal motor vehicle total ownership cost
savings benefits of widespread adoption of electric motor vehicles, it is
necessary, appropriate, and in the best interest of the state to create a
community access enterprise that can provide specialized business
services, including impact remediation services, that help communities,
businesses, and governmental entities construct the electric motor vehicle
charging and fueling infrastructure needed to support widespread
adoption of electric motor vehicles, including light-duty, medium-duty,
and heavy-duty motor vehicles and motor vehicles used to make retail
deliveries, and thereby assuage range anxiety concerns, supply chain
disruption concerns, and any other concerns that currently disincentivize
the widespread adoption of electric motor vehicles;
(b) The specific focus of the enterprise is the equitable reduction
and mitigation of the adverse environmental and health impacts of air
pollution and greenhouse gas emissions at the community level through
support of the adoption of electric motor vehicles and electric alternatives
to motor vehicles at the community level, including but not limited to
-3- HB26-1266

within disproportionately impacted communities throughout the state;
(c) The enterprise provides impact remediation services when, in
exchange for the payment of community access retail delivery fees by or
on behalf of purchasers of tangible personal property for retail delivery,
it acts to mitigate the impacts of residential and commercial deliveries on
the state's transportation infrastructure, air quality, and emissions by:
(I) Funding the construction of electric motor vehicle charging
infrastructure that supports the use of clean and quiet electric motor
vehicles, including motor vehicles used to make retail deliveries;
(II) Specifically supporting and incentivizing the retirement of old
and inefficient motor vehicles powered by internal combustion engines
and the adoption of electric motor vehicles, electric alternatives to motor
vehicles, and transit use in communities, including but not limited to
disproportionately impacted communities, that generally bear the greatest
burden of the environmental and health impacts of transportation
emissions due to disparities in transportation pollution exposure;
(III) Providing outreach, education, planning funds, or training to
support the successful applications for funding and the performance of
entities receiving funds;
(IV) Contributing to the comprehensive regulatory scheme
required for the planning, funding, development, construction,
maintenance, and supervision of a sustainable transportation system; and
(V) Providing additional remediation services to offset impacts
caused by fee payers as may be provided by law;
(d) By providing remediation services as authorized by this
section, the enterprise provides a benefit to fee payers when it remediates
the impacts they cause and therefore operates as a business in accordance
-4- HB26-1266

with the determination of the Colorado supreme court in Colorado Union
of Taxpayers Foundation v. City of Aspen, 2018 CO 36;
(e) Consistent with the determination of the Colorado supreme
court in Nicholl v. E-470 Public Highway Authority, 896 P.2d 859 (Colo.
1995), that the power to impose taxes is inconsistent with enterprise status
under section 20 of article X of the state constitution, it is the conclusion
of the general assembly that the revenue collected by the enterprise is
generated by fees, not taxes, because the community access retail delivery
fee imposed by the enterprise as authorized by section 24-38.5-303 (7) is:
(I) Imposed for the specific purpose of allowing the enterprise to
defray the costs of providing the remediation services specified in this
section, including mitigating impacts to air quality and greenhouse gas
emissions caused by the activities on which the fee is assessed, and
contributes to the implementation of the comprehensive regulatory
scheme required for the planning, funding, development, construction,
maintenance, and supervision of a sustainable transportation system; and
(II) Collected at rates that are reasonably calculated based on the
impacts caused by fee payers and the cost of remediating those impacts;
and
(f) So long as the enterprise qualifies as an enterprise for purposes
of section 20 of article X of the state constitution, the revenue from the
community access retail delivery fee collected by the enterprise is not
state fiscal year spending, as defined in section 24-77-102 (17), or state
revenues, as defined in section 24-77-103.6 (6)(c), and does not count
against either the state fiscal year spending limit imposed by section 20
of article X of the state constitution or the excess state revenues cap, as
defined in section 24-77-103.6 (6)(b)(I)(D).
-5- HB26-1266

SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-38.5-302, repeal
(11), (17), and (18) as follows:
24-38.5-302. Definitions. As used in this part 3, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(11) "Inflation" means the average annual percentage change in
the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, consumer
price index for Denver-Aurora-Lakewood for all items and all urban
consumers, or its applicable predecessor or successor index, for the five
years ending on the last December 31 before the state fiscal year for
which an inflation adjustment to be made to the community access retail
delivery fee imposed pursuant to section 24-38.5-303 (7) begins.
(17) "Retail delivery" has the same meaning as set forth in section
43-4-218 (2)(e).
(18) "Retailer" has the same meaning as set forth in section
39-26-102 (8).
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-38.5-303, amend
(5)(a) and (6)(f); and repeal (3)(a), (6)(g), and (7) as follows:
24-38.5-303. Community access enterprise - creation - board
- powers and duties - fund - transparency and reporting.
(3) The business purpose of the enterprise is to support the
widespread adoption of electric motor vehicles, including motor vehicles
that originally were powered exclusively by internal combustion engines
but have been converted into electric motor vehicles, in an equitable
manner by directly investing in transportation infrastructure, making
grants or providing rebates or other financing options to fund the
construction of electric motor vehicle charging infrastructure throughout
the state, and incentivizing the acquisition and use of electric motor
-6- HB26-1266

vehicles and electric alternatives to motor vehicles in communities,
including but not limited to disproportionately impacted communities,
and by owners of older, less fuel efficient, and higher polluting vehicles.
To allow the enterprise to accomplish this business purpose and fully
exercise its powers and duties through the board, the enterprise may:
(a) Impose a community access retail delivery fee as authorized
by subsection (7) of this section;
(5) (a) The community access enterprise fund is hereby created in
the state treasury. The fund consists of community access retail delivery
fee revenue credited to the fund pursuant to subsection (7) of this section,
any monetary gifts, grants, donations, or other payments received by the
enterprise, any federal money that may be credited to the fund, and any
other money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the
fund. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from
the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund. Money in the
fund is continuously appropriated to the enterprise and may be expended
to provide grants and rebates, pay its reasonable and necessary operating
expenses, including the repayment of any loan received pursuant to
subsection (5)(b) of this section, and otherwise exercise its powers and
perform its duties as authorized by this part 3.
(6) In addition to any other powers and duties specified in this
section, the board has the following general powers and duties:
(f) To publish grant and similar program processes by which the
enterprise accepts applications, the criteria used for evaluating
applications, and a list of grantees pursuant to subsection (8) of this
section; AND
(g) To promulgate rules for the sole purpose of setting the amount
-7- HB26-1266

of the community access retail delivery fee at or below the maximum
amount authorized in this section; and
(7) (a) In furtherance of its business purpose, beginning in state
fiscal year 2022-23, the enterprise shall impose, and the department of
revenue shall collect on behalf of the enterprise, a community access
retail delivery fee on each retail delivery. Each retailer who makes a retail
delivery shall either collect and remit or elect to pay the community
access retail delivery fee in the manner prescribed by the department in
accordance with section 43-4-218 (6). For the purpose of minimizing
compliance costs for retailers and administrative costs for the state, the
department of revenue shall collect and administer the community access
retail delivery fee on behalf of the enterprise in the same manner in which
it collects and administers the retail delivery fee imposed by section
43-4-218 (3).
(b) For retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased
during state fiscal year 2022-23, the enterprise shall impose the
community access retail delivery fee in a maximum amount of six and
nine-tenths cents.
(c) (I) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7)(c)(II) of this
section, for retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased
during state fiscal year 2023-24 or during any subsequent state fiscal year,
the enterprise shall impose the community access retail delivery fee in a
maximum amount that is the maximum amount for the prior state fiscal
year adjusted for inflation. The enterprise shall notify the department of
revenue of the amount of the community access retail delivery fee to be
collected for retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased
during each state fiscal year no later than March 15 of the calendar year
-8- HB26-1266

in which the state fiscal year begins, and the department of revenue shall
publish the amount no later than April15 of the calendar year in which the
state fiscal year begins.
(II) The enterprise is authorized to adjust the amount of the
community access retail delivery fee for retail deliveries of tangible
personal property purchased during a state fiscal year only if the
department of revenue adjusts the amount of the retail delivery fee
imposed by section 43-4-218 (3) for retail deliveries of tangible personal
property purchased during the state fiscal year.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-7.5-101, amend
(2)(d); and repeal (1) and (2)(e) as follows:
25-7.5-101. Legislative declaration.
(1) The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:
(a) An increasing number of fleet motor vehicles are on the road
to meet increasing demands for retail deliveries and rides arranged
through transportation network companies;
(b) These fleet vehicles are some of the most polluting vehicles on
the road, which has resulted in additional and increasing air and
greenhouse gas pollution and related adverse environmental and health
impacts across the state;
(c) The adverse environmental and health impacts of increased
emissions from fleet motor vehicles used to make retail deliveries and
provide rides arranged through transportation network companies can be
mitigated and offset by supporting the widespread adoption of electric
motor vehicles for use in motor vehicle fleets;
(d) Instead of reducing the impacts of retail deliveries and rides
arranged through transportation network companies by limiting retail
-9- HB26-1266

delivery and transportation network company ride activity through
regulation, it is more appropriate to continue to allow persons who
receive retail deliveries and benefit from the convenience afforded by
unfettered retail deliveries and to allow transportation network companies
that arrange prearranged rides to continue to provide that service without
undue restrictions and instead impose a small fee on each retail delivery
and ride and use fee revenue to fund necessary mitigation activities; and
(e) It is necessary, appropriate, and in the best interest of the state
and all Coloradans to incentivize and support the use of electric motor
vehicles and, to the extent temporarily necessitated by the limitations of
current electric motor vehicle technology and availability for certain fleet
uses, compressed natural gas motor vehicles that are fueled by recovered
methane and that produce fewer emissions than gasoline or diesel
powered motor vehicles, by businesses and governmental entities that use
fleets of motor vehicles, including fleets composed of personal motor
vehicles owned by individual contractors who provide prearranged rides
for transportation network companies or make retail deliveries, and to
enable the state to achieve its stated electric motor vehicle adoption goals
because increased usage of electric motor vehicles in motor vehicle fleets:
(I) Generally reduces emissions of air pollutants, including ozone
precursors, particulate matter pollutants, other hazardous air pollutants,
and greenhouse gases, that contribute to adverse environmental effects
such as climate change and adverse human health effects, including but
not limited to asthma, reduced lung capacity, increased susceptibility to
respiratory illnesses, chronic bronchitis, heart disease, and lung cancer,
and helps the state meet its statewide greenhouse gas pollution reduction
targets established in section 25-7-102 (2)(g), comply with air quality
-10- HB26-1266

attainment standards, and reduce adverse environmental and health
impacts across the state and in communities, including but not limited to
disproportionately impacted communities;
(II) Specifically reduces higher localized emissions of such air
pollutants in communities, including but not limited to disproportionately
impacted communities, where:
(A) Fleet yards, warehouses, distribution centers, refineries, fuel
depots, waste facilities, and major interstate highways are located;
(B) Usage of fleet motor vehicles is concentrated; and
(C) Residents experience increased risks of air-pollution-related
health impacts such as asthma, reduced lung capacity, increased
susceptibility to respiratory illnesses, heart disease, and lung cancer; and
(III) By reducing fuel and maintenance costs, helps businesses and
governmental entities operate more efficiently over time, allowing the
cost savings to be reinvested in business growth or used for beneficial
public purposes.
(2) The general assembly further finds and declares that:
(d) By providing remediation services as authorized by this
section, the enterprise provides a benefit to fee payers when it remediates
the impacts they cause and therefore operates as a business in accordance
with the determination of the Colorado supreme court in Colorado Union
of Taxpayers Foundation v. City of Aspen, 2018 CO 36; AND
(e) Consistent with the determination of the Colorado supreme
court in Nicholl v. E-470 Public Highway Authority, 896 P.2d 859 (Colo.
1995), that the power to impose taxes is inconsistent with enterprise status
under section 20 of article X of the state constitution, it is the conclusion
of the general assembly that the revenue collected by the enterprise is
-11- HB26-1266

generated by fees, not taxes, because the fees imposed by the enterprise
as authorized by section 25-7.5-103 (7) and (8) are:
(I) Imposed for the specific purpose of allowing the enterprise to
defray the costs of providing the remediation services specified in this
section, including mitigating impacts to air quality and greenhouse gas
emissions caused by the activities on which the fee is assessed, and
contributes to the implementation of the comprehensive regulatory
scheme required for the planning, funding, development, construction,
maintenance, and supervision of a sustainable transportation system; and
(II) Collected at rates that are reasonably calculated based on the
impacts caused by fee payers and the cost of remediating those impacts;
and
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-7.5-102, amend
(13); and repeal (21) as follows:
25-7.5-102. Definitions.
As used in this article 7.5, unless the context otherwise requires:
(13) "Inflation" means the average annual percentage change in
the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, consumer
price index for Denver-Aurora-Lakewood for all items and all urban
consumers, or its applicable predecessor or successor index, for the five
years ending on the last December 31 before a state fiscal year for which
an inflation adjustment to be made to the clean fleet per ride fee imposed
by section 25-7.5-103 (7) or the clean fleet retail delivery fee imposed by
section 25-7.5-103 (8) begins.
(21) "Retail delivery" has the same meaning as set forth in section
43-4-218 (2)(e).
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-7.5-103, amend
-12- HB26-1266

(3)(a), (5)(a), and (6)(h); and repeal (8) as follows:
25-7.5-103. Clean fleet enterprise - creation - board - powers
and duties - fees - fund. (3) The business purpose of the enterprise is to
incentivize and support the use of electric motor vehicles, including
motor vehicles that originally were powered exclusively by internal
combustion engines but have been converted into electric motor vehicles,
and, to the extent temporarily necessitated by the limitations of current
electric motor vehicle technology for certain fleet uses, compressed
natural gas motor vehicles that are fueled by recovered methane, by
businesses and governmental entities that own or operate fleets of motor
vehicles, including fleets composed of personal motor vehicles owned or
leased by individual contractors who provide prearranged rides for
transportation network companies or deliver goods for a third-party
delivery service. To allow the enterprise to accomplish this purpose and
fully exercise its powers and duties through the board, the enterprise may:
(a) Impose a clean fleet per ride fee and a clean fleet retail
delivery fee as authorized by subsections (7) and (8) SUBSECTION (7) of
this section;
(5) (a) The clean fleet enterprise fund is hereby created in the state
treasury. The fund consists of clean fleet per ride fee revenue and clean
fleet retail delivery fee revenue credited to the fund pursuant to
subsections (7) and (8) SUBSECTION (7) of this section, any monetary
gifts, grants, donations, or other payments received by the enterprise, any
federal money that may be credited to the fund, and any other money that
the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund. The state
treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and
investment of money in the fund to the fund. Money in the fund is
-13- HB26-1266

continuously appropriated to the enterprise for the purposes set forth in
this article 7.5 and to pay the enterprise's reasonable and necessary
operating expenses, including the repayment of any loan received
pursuant to subsection (5)(b) of this section.
(6) In addition to any other powers and duties specified in this
section, the board has the following general powers and duties:
(h) To promulgate ADOPT rules for the sole purpose of setting the
amounts AMOUNT of the clean fleet per ride fee and the clean fleet retail
delivery fee at or below the maximum amounts AMOUNT authorized in
this section; and
(8) (a) In furtherance of its business purpose, beginning in state
fiscal year 2022-23, the enterprise shall impose, and the department of
revenue shall collect on behalf of the enterprise, a clean fleet retail
delivery fee on each retail delivery. Each retailer who makes a retail
delivery shall either collect and remit or elect to pay the clean fleet retail
delivery fee in the manner prescribed by the department in accordance
with section 43-4-218 (6). For the purpose of minimizing compliance
costs for retailers and administrative costs for the state, the department of
revenue shall collect and administer the clean fleet retail delivery fee on
behalf of the enterprise in the same manner in which it collects and
administers the retail delivery fee imposed by section 43-4-218 (3).
(b) For retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased
during state fiscal year 2022-23, the enterprise shall impose the clean fleet
retail delivery fee in a maximum amount of five and three-tenths cents.
(c) (I) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (8)(c)(II) of this
section, for retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased
during state fiscal year 2023-24 or during any subsequent state fiscal year,
-14- HB26-1266

the enterprise shall impose the clean fleet retail delivery fee in a
maximum amount that is the maximum amount for the prior state fiscal
year adjusted for inflation. The enterprise shall notify the department of
revenue of the amount of the clean fleet retail delivery fee to be collected
for retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased during each
state fiscal year no later than March 15 of the calendar year in which the
state fiscal year begins, and the department of revenue shall publish the
amount no later than April15 of the calendar year in which the state fiscal
year begins.
(II) The enterprise is authorized to adjust the amount of the clean
fleet retail delivery fee for retail deliveries of tangible personal property
purchased during a state fiscal year only if the department of revenue
adjusts the amount of the retail delivery fee imposed by section 43-4-218
(3) for retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased during the
state fiscal year.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-21-119.5, amend
(2)(s) and (2)(t); and repeal (2)(u) as follows:
39-21-119.5. Mandatory electronic filing of returns -
mandatory electronic payment - penalty - waiver - definitions.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
executive director may, as specified in subsection (3) of this section,
require the electronic filing of returns and require the payment of any tax
or fee due by electronic funds transfer for the following:
(s) Any prepaid wireless 911 charge report required to be filed and
payment required to be made pursuant to section 29-11-102.5 (3); AND
(t) Any prepaid telephone disability access charge report required
to be filed and payment required to be made pursuant to section
-15- HB26-1266

40-17-104. and
(u) Any retail delivery fee or enterprise retail delivery fees return
required to be filed pursuant to section 43-4-218 (6).
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-26-102, amend
(7)(a) introductory portion as follows:
39-26-102. Definitions. As used in this article 26, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(7) (a) "Purchase price" means the price to the consumer,
exclusive of any direct tax imposed by the federal government or by this
article 26, exclusive of any retail delivery fee and enterprise retail
delivery fees imposed or collected as specified in section 43-4-218, and,
in the case of all retail sales involving the exchange of property, also
exclusive of the fair market value of the property exchanged at the time
and place of the exchange, if:
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-37-103, repeal
(15)(a)(IV) as follows:
39-37-103. Definitions.
As used in this article 37, unless the context otherwise requires:
(15) (a) "Purchase price" means the aggregate consideration
valued in money paid or delivered or promised to be paid or delivered by
the user or consumer in consummation of a sale, exclusive of:
(IV) Any retail delivery fee and enterprise retail delivery fees
imposed or collected as specified in section 43-4-218;
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 43-4-205, repeal
(6.8)(b) as follows:
43-4-205. Allocation of fund - repeal.
(6.8) (b) (I) Revenue from the retail delivery fee imposed pursuant
-16- HB26-1266

to section 43-4-218 (3) that is credited to the highway users tax fund as
required by section 43-4-218 (5)(a)(I) must be allocated and expended as
follows:
(A) Forty percent must be paid to the state highway fund and
expended as provided in section 43-4-206;
(B) Thirty-three percent must be paid to the county treasurers of
the respective counties, subject to annual appropriation by the general
assembly, and allocated and expended as provided in section 43-4-207;
and
(C) Twenty-seven percent must be paid to the cities and
incorporated towns, subject to annual appropriation by the general
assembly, and must be allocated and expended as provided in section
43-4-208 (2)(b) and (6)(a).
(II) Revenue from the retail delivery fee may be expended for the
purposes specified in subsection (6)(b) of this section and may also be
expended for transit-related projects needed to integrate different
transportation modes within a multimodal transportation system.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 43-4-218 as
follows:
43-4-218. Additional funding - retail delivery fee - fund
created - simultaneous collection of enterprise fees - rules - legislative
declaration - definitions.
(1) The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:
(a) In recent years, the number of retail deliveries of tangible
personal property, including restaurant food, has rapidly increased, and
this rapid growth is expected to continue;
(b) The world economic forum estimates that by 2030 there will
-17- HB26-1266

be over thirty percent more delivery vehicles on roads to deliver
seventy-eight percent more packages, which will increase usage of the
highways, roads, and streets of the state by motor vehicles used to make
retail deliveries, traffic congestion, and retail-delivery-related emissions;
(c) This additional usage has accelerated and is expected to
continue to accelerate deterioration of surface transportation system
infrastructure, and has required and is expected to continue to require the
state, counties, and municipalities to perform more maintenance and
reconstruction of state highways, county roads, and city streets;
(d) This additional usage has also increased and is expected to
continue to increase motor-vehicle-related emissions of air pollutants,
including ozone precursors, particulate matter pollutants, other hazardous
air pollutants, and greenhouse gases, that contribute to adverse
environmental effects, including but not limited to climate change, and
adverse human health effects;
(d.3) There are administrative costs for a retailer when the state
imposes a fee on retail deliveries, and the benefits from the fee revenue
need to be balanced with the potential economic impacts on the retailers;
(d.7) Fees on retail deliveries should only be imposed on retailers
that are large enough to absorb these administrative costs without
significant economic harm;
(e) It is therefore necessary and appropriate:
(I) To impose a retail delivery fee as specified in this section and
to credit the proceeds of the fee to the highway users tax fund created in
section 43-4-201 for allocation to the state, counties, and municipalities
and to the multimodal transportation and mitigation options fund created
in section 43-4-1103 (1)(a);
-18- HB26-1266

(II) To authorize the community access enterprise created in
section 24-38.5-303 (1) to impose a community access retail delivery fee
as specified in section 24-38.5-303 (7), authorize the clean fleet enterprise
created in section 25-7.5-103 (1)(a) to impose a clean fleet retail delivery
fee as specified in section 25-7.5-103 (8), authorize the statewide bridge
and tunnel enterprise created in section 43-4-805 (2)(a)(I) to impose a
bridge and tunnel retail delivery fee as specified in section 43-4-805
(5)(g.7), authorize the clean transit enterprise created in section
43-4-1203 (1)(a) to impose a clean transit retail delivery fee as specified
in section 43-4-1203 (7), and authorize the nonattainment area air
pollution mitigation enterprise created in section 43-4-1303 (1)(a) to
impose an air pollution mitigation retail delivery fee as specified in
section 43-1-1303 (8) to help fund the enterprises' pursuit of their
respective business purposes;
(III) For the purpose of minimizing compliance costs for fee
payers and administrative costs for the state, to require the department of
revenue to collect the retail delivery fees imposed by the enterprises on
behalf of the enterprises when it collects the retail delivery fee imposed
by subsection (3) of this section and to distribute the enterprise fee
revenue to the enterprises; and
(IV) To create an exemption from the retail delivery fees for
retailers with retail sales of five hundred thousand dollars or less.
(2) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Enterprise retail delivery fees" means:
(I) The community access retail delivery fee imposed by the
community access enterprise created in section 24-38.5-303 (1), as
specified in section 24-38.5-303 (7);
-19- HB26-1266

(II) The clean fleet retail delivery fee imposed by the clean fleet
enterprise created in section 25-7.5-103 (1)(a), as specified in section
25-7.5-103 (8);
(III) The bridge and tunnel retail delivery fee imposed by the
statewide bridge and tunnel enterprise created in section 43-4-805
(2)(a)(I), as specified in section 43-4-805 (5)(g.7);
(IV) The clean transit retail delivery fee imposed by the clean
transit enterprise created in section 43-4-1203 (1)(a) as specified in
section 43-4-1203 (7); and
(V) The air pollution mitigation retail delivery fee imposed by the
nonattainment area air pollution mitigation enterprise created in section
43-4-1303 (1)(a) as specified in section 43-1-1303 (8).
(b) "Inflation" means the average annual percentage change in the
United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, consumer
price index for Denver-Aurora-Lakewood for all items and all urban
consumers, or its applicable predecessor or successor index, for the five
years ending on the last December 31 before the calendar year in which
a state fiscal year for which an inflation adjustment to the retail delivery
fee imposed by subsection (3) of this section is to be made begins.
(c) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as set forth in section
42-1-102 (58). The term does not include a personal delivery device.
(d) "Personal delivery device" means an autonomously operated
robot that is:
(I) Designed and manufactured for the purpose of transporting
tangible personal property primarily on sidewalks, crosswalks, and other
public rights-of-way that are typically used by pedestrians;
(II) Weighs no more than five hundred fifty pounds, excluding
-20- HB26-1266

any tangible personal property being transported; and
(III) Operates at speeds of less than ten miles per hour when on
sidewalks, crosswalks, and other public rights-of-way that are typically
used by pedestrians.
(e) "Retail delivery" means a retail sale of tangible personal
property by a retailer for delivery by a motor vehicle owned or operated
by the retailer or any other person to the purchaser at a location in this
state, which sale includes at least one item of tangible personal property
that is subject to taxation under article 26 of title 39. Each such retail sale
is a single retail delivery regardless of the number of shipments necessary
to deliver the items of tangible personal property purchased.
(f) "Retailer" has the same meaning as set forth in section
39-26-102 (8).
(g) "Retail sale" has the same meaning as set forth in section
39-26-102 (9).
(h) "Tangible personal property" has the same meaning as set
forth in section 39-26-102 (15).
(3) (a) A retail delivery fee in an amount set forth in this
subsection (3)(a) and subsection (3)(b) of this section is imposed on each
retail delivery. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6)(b)(II) of
this section, for retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased
during state fiscal year 2022-23, each retailer who makes a retail delivery
shall add to the price of the retail delivery, collect from the purchaser, and
pay to the department of revenue at the time and in the manner prescribed
by the department in accordance with subsection (6) of this section a
retail delivery fee in the amount of eight and four-tenths cents.
(b) (I) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6)(b)(II) of this
-21- HB26-1266

section, for retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased
during state fiscal year 2023-24 or during any subsequent state fiscal year,
each retailer who makes a retail delivery shall add to the price of the retail
delivery, collect from the purchaser, and pay to the department of revenue
at the time and in the manner prescribed by the department in accordance
with subsection (6) of this section a retail delivery fee equal to the amount
of the retail delivery fee for retail deliveries of tangible personal property
purchased during the prior state fiscal year adjusted for inflation. The
department of revenue shall annually calculate the inflation adjusted
amount of the retail delivery fee to be imposed on retail deliveries of
tangible personal property purchased during each state fiscal year and
shall publish the amount no later than April 15 of the calendar year in
which the state fiscal year begins.
(II) The department of revenue shall adjust the amount of the
retail delivery fee for retail deliveries of tangible personal property
purchased during a state fiscal year only if inflation is positive and
cumulative inflation from the time of the last adjustment in the amount of
the retail delivery fee, when applied to the sum of the current retail
delivery fee and all current enterprise retail delivery fees and rounded to
the nearest whole cent, will result in an increase of at least one whole cent
in the total amount of the retail delivery fee and all enterprise retail
delivery fees imposed on each retail delivery. The amount of cumulative
inflation to be applied to the sum of the current retail delivery fee and all
current enterprise retail delivery fees and rounded to the nearest whole
cent is the lesser of actual cumulative inflation or five percent.
(c) A retail delivery that includes only tangible personal property,
the sale of which is exempt from state sales tax under article 26 of title
-22- HB26-1266

39, is exempt from the retail delivery fee and from the enterprise retail
delivery fees. A retail delivery made to a purchaser who is exempt from
paying state sales tax under article 26 of title 39 is exempt from the retail
delivery fee and from the enterprise retail delivery fees.
(d) (I) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a retail
delivery by a qualified business made on or after July 1, 2022, is exempt
from the retail delivery fee imposed by this subsection (3) and the
enterprise retail delivery fees.
(II) There are no refunds under section 39-26-703 of any retail
delivery fees for a retail delivery made on or after July 1, 2022, but before
July 1, 2023, on the basis of the exemption set forth in subsection
(3)(d)(I) of this section.
(III) As used in this subsection (3)(d), "qualified business" means
a retailer that in the previous calendar year made retail sales of tangible
personal property, commodities, or services in the state totaling five
hundred thousand dollars or less. If the retailer had no retail sales in the
state in the previous calendar year, then the retailer is deemed to be a
"qualified business" for the current calendar year, until the first day of the
month after the ninetieth day after the retailer has made retail sales of
tangible personal property, commodities, or services in the state that total
more than five hundred thousand dollars.
(4) (a) For the purpose of minimizing compliance costs for
retailers and administrative costs for the state, the department of revenue
shall, when it collects the retail delivery fee imposed by subsection (3) of
this section, also collect on behalf of the community access enterprise
created in section 24-38.5-303 (1), the clean fleet enterprise created in
section 25-7.5-103 (1)(a), the statewide bridge and tunnel enterprise
-23- HB26-1266

created in section 43-4-805 (2)(a)(I), the clean transit enterprise created
in section 43-1-1203 (1)(a), and the nonattainment area air pollution
mitigation enterprise created in section 43-4-1303 (1)(a), the enterprise
retail delivery fees.
(b) When collecting the retail delivery fee and, in accordance with
subsection (4)(a) of this section, the enterprise retail delivery fees, the
department of revenue shall retain an amount that does not exceed the
total cost of collecting, administering, and enforcing the retail delivery fee
and the enterprise retail delivery fees and shall transmit the amount
retained to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the retail delivery fees
fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. All money in the retail
delivery fees fund is continuously appropriated to the department of
revenue to defray the costs incurred by the department in collecting,
enforcing, and administering the retail delivery fee and the enterprise
retail delivery fees.
(5) (a) The department of revenue shall transmit all net revenue
collected from the retail delivery fee imposed by subsection (3) of this
section to the state treasurer, who shall credit the net revenue as follows:
(I) Seventy-one and one-tenth percent shall be credited to the
highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201 and allocated from the
highway users tax fund to the state, counties, and municipalities as
required by section 43-4-205 (6.8); and
(II) Twenty-eight and nine-tenths percent shall be credited to the
multimodal transportation and mitigation options fund created in section
43-4-1103 (1)(a);
(b) The department of revenue shall transmit all net revenue
collected from enterprise retail delivery fees to the state treasurer who
-24- HB26-1266

shall credit the net revenue as follows:
(I) All net community access retail delivery fee revenue shall be
credited to the community access enterprise fund created in section
24-38.5-303 (5);
(II) All net clean fleet retail delivery fee revenue shall be credited
to the clean fleet enterprise fund created in section 25-7.5-103 (5);
(III) All net bridge and tunnel retail delivery fee revenue shall be
credited to the statewide bridge and tunnel enterprise special revenue
fund created in section 43-4-805 (3)(a);
(IV) All net clean transit retail delivery fee revenue shall be
credited to the clean transit enterprise fund created in section 43-4-1203
(5); and
(V) All net air pollution mitigation retail delivery fee revenue
shall be credited to the nonattainment area air pollution mitigation
enterprise fund created in section 43-4-1303 (5).
(6) (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (6), the
collection, administration, and enforcement of the retail delivery fee
imposed by subsection (3) of this section and the enterprise retail delivery
fees shall be performed by the executive director of the department of
revenue in the same manner as the collection, administration, and
enforcement of state sales tax pursuant to article 26 of title 39.
(b) (I) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6)(b)(II) of this
section, every retailer who makes a retail delivery shall add the retail
delivery fee imposed by subsection (3) of this section and the enterprise
retail delivery fees to the price or charge for the retail delivery showing
the total of the fees as one item called "retail delivery fees" that is
separate and distinct from the price and any other taxes or fees imposed
-25- HB26-1266

on the retail delivery. If added, the fees constitute a part of the retail
delivery price or charge, are a debt from the purchaser to the retailer until
paid, and are recoverable at law in the same manner as other debts.
(II) A retailer may elect to pay the retail delivery fee imposed by
subsection (3) of this section and the enterprise retail delivery fees for a
retail delivery on behalf of a purchaser. If a retailer elects to pay these
fees, then:
(A) The retailer shall not add the fees to the price or charge for the
retail delivery showing the total of the fees as one item called "retail
delivery fees" that is separate and distinct from the price and any other
taxes or fees imposed on the retail delivery;
(B) The purchaser is neither liable nor responsible for the payment
of the fees; and
(C) The purchaser is not entitled to a refund for fees that are paid
for a retail delivery that is exempt under subsection (3)(c) or (3)(d) of this
section. A retailer may claim a refund under section 39-26-703 for the
exempt fees paid; except that section 39-26-703 (2.5)(b)(I)(B) shall not
apply in this circumstance.
(c) Every retailer who makes a retail delivery is liable and
responsible for the payment of an amount equivalent to the total amount
of the retail delivery fee imposed by subsection (3) of this section and the
enterprise retail delivery fees for each retail delivery made irrespective of
the requirements of subsection (6)(b) of this section. The burden of
proving that a retailer is exempt from collecting or electing to pay the fees
on any retail delivery and paying the fees to the executive director of the
department of revenue is on the retailer under such reasonable
requirements of proof as the executive director may prescribe. The retailer
-26- HB26-1266

is entitled, as collecting agent for the state, to apply and credit the amount
of the retailer's collections, if any, against the amount to be paid pursuant
to this subsection (6)(c).
(d) (I) A retailer who collects the retail delivery fee imposed by
subsection (3) of this section and the enterprise retail delivery fees shall
remit the fees to the department of revenue at the same time and in the
same manner as the retailer remits sales tax revenue collected to the
department as required by article 26 of title 39 unless the department
requires or authorizes the fees to be remitted at another time or in another
manner.
(II) A retailer who elects to pay the retail delivery fee imposed by
subsection (3) of this section and the enterprise retail delivery fees on
behalf of a purchaser in accordance with subsection (6)(b)(II) of this
section shall remit the fees to the department of revenue as if the fees had
been collected from the purchaser on the date of the retail delivery, as
specified in subsection (6)(d)(I) of this section.
(e) All money paid to a retailer as a retail delivery fee imposed by
subsection (3) of this section, or as one or more of the enterprise retail
delivery fees, shall be and remains public money, the property of the state
of Colorado, in the hands of the retailer, and the retailer shall hold the
money in trust for the sole use and benefit of the state of Colorado until
paid to the executive director of the department of revenue, and, for
failure to pay the money to the executive director, a retailer shall be
punished as provided by law. If any retailer collects fees in excess of the
amount imposed by this section and sections 24-38.5-303 (7), 25-7.5-103
(8), 43-4-1203 (7), and 43-4-1303 (8), the retailer shall remit to the
executive director of the department of revenue the full amount of the
-27- HB26-1266

fees and also the full amount of the excess.
(f) The department of revenue shall waive any processing costs,
as defined in section 39-21-119.5 (7)(d)(II), for electronic payment of the
retail delivery fee imposed by subsection (3) of this section and the
enterprise retail delivery fees if:
(I) The processing costs would exceed the amount of the retail
delivery fees the retailer is remitting; and
(II) The electronic payment is by automated clearing house (ACH)
debit.
(7) The department of revenue may promulgate rules to implement
this section.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 43-4-805, amend
(2)(b)(I), (2)(c), (3)(a), (5)(r)(I), and (5)(r)(III)(A); and repeal (1)(b) and
(5)(g.7) as follows:
43-4-805. Statewide bridge enterprise - creation - board -
funds - powers and duties - legislative declaration - definitions.
(1) The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:
(b) Due to the limited availability of state and federal funding and
the need to accomplish the financing, repair, reconstruction, and
replacement of designated bridges; the completion of preventative
maintenance bridge projects; and the completion of tunnel projects as
promptly and efficiently as possible, it is necessary to create a statewide
bridge and tunnel enterprise and to authorize the enterprise to:
(I) Enter into agreements with the commission or the department
to finance, repair, reconstruct, and replace designated bridges, complete
preventative maintenance bridge projects, and complete tunnel projects
in the state; and
-28- HB26-1266

(II) Impose a bridge safety surcharge, a bridge and tunnel impact
fee and a bridge and tunnel retail delivery fee at rates reasonably
calculated to defray the costs of completing designated bridge projects,
preventative maintenance bridge projects, and tunnel projects and
distribute the burden of defraying the costs in a manner based on the
benefits received by persons paying the fees and using designated bridges
and tunnels, and receiving retail deliveries, receive and expend revenue
generated by the surcharge and fees and other money, issue revenue
bonds and other obligations, contract with the state, if required approvals
are obtained, to receive one or more loans of money received by the state
under the terms of one or more financed purchase of an asset or certificate
of participation agreements authorized by this part 8, expend revenue
generated by the surcharge to repay any such loan or loans received, and
exercise other powers necessary and appropriate to carry out its purposes;
and
(2) (b) The business purpose of the bridge enterprise is to finance,
repair, reconstruct, and replace any designated bridge in the state,
complete preventative maintenance bridge projects, and complete tunnel
projects and, as agreed upon by the enterprise and the commission, or the
department to the extent authorized by the commission, to maintain the
bridges it finances, repairs, reconstructs, and replaces. To allow the
bridge enterprise to accomplish this purpose and fully exercise its powers
and duties through the bridge enterprise board, the bridge enterprise may:
(I) Impose a bridge safety surcharge AND a bridge and tunnel
impact fee and a bridge and tunnel retail delivery fee as authorized by
subsections (5)(g) AND (5)(g.5) and (5)(g.7) of this section;
(c) The bridge enterprise constitutes an enterprise for purposes of
-29- HB26-1266

section 20 of article X of the state constitution so long as it retains the
authority to issue revenue bonds and receives less than ten percent of its
total revenues in grants from all Colorado state and local governments
combined. So long as it constitutes an enterprise pursuant to this
subsection (2)(c), the bridge enterprise shall not be subject to any
provisions of section 20 of article X of the state constitution. Consistent
with the determination of the Colorado supreme court in Nicholl v. E-470
Public Highway Authority, 896 P.2d 859 (Colo. 1995), that the power to
impose taxes is inconsistent with "enterprise" status under section 20 of
article X of the state constitution, the general assembly finds and declares
that a bridge safety surcharge OR a bridge and tunnel impact fee or a
bridge and tunnel retail delivery fee imposed by the bridge enterprise as
authorized by subsection (5)(g) OR (5)(g.5) or (5)(g.7) of this section is
not a tax but is instead a fee imposed by the bridge enterprise to defray
the cost of completing designated bridge projects, preventative
maintenance bridge projects, and tunnel projects that the enterprise
provides as a specific service to the persons upon whom the fee is
imposed and at rates reasonably calculated based on the benefits received
by such persons.
(3) (a) The statewide bridge and tunnel enterprise special revenue
fund, referred to in this part 8 as the "bridge special fund", is hereby
created in the state treasury. All revenue received by the bridge enterprise,
including, but not limited to, revenue from a bridge safety surcharge
imposed as authorized by subsection (5)(g) of this section, revenue from
a bridge and tunnel impact fee imposed as authorized by subsection
(5)(g.5) of this section, revenue from a bridge and tunnel retail delivery
fee imposed as authorized by subsection (5)(g.7) of this section, and any
-30- HB26-1266

money loaned to the enterprise by the state pursuant to subsection (5)(r)
of this section, shall be deposited into the bridge special fund. The bridge
enterprise board may establish separate accounts within the bridge special
fund as needed in connection with any specific designated bridge project,
preventative maintenance bridge project, or tunnel project. The bridge
enterprise also may deposit or permit others to deposit other money into
the bridge special fund, but in no event may revenue from any tax
otherwise available for general purposes be deposited into the bridge
special fund. The state treasurer, after consulting with the bridge
enterprise board, shall invest any money in the bridge special fund,
including any surplus or reserves, but excluding any proceeds from the
sale of bonds or earnings on such proceeds invested pursuant to section
43-4-807 (2), that are not needed for immediate use. Such money may be
invested in the types of investments authorized in sections 24-36-109,
24-36-112, and 24-36-113.
(5) In addition to any other powers and duties specified in this
section, the bridge enterprise board has the following powers and duties:
(g.7) (I) In furtherance of its business purpose, beginning in state
fiscal year 2022-23, the bridge enterprise shall impose, and the
department of revenue shall collect on behalf of the bridge enterprise, a
bridge and tunnel retail delivery fee on each retail delivery. Each retailer
who makes a retail delivery shall either collect and remit or elect to pay
the bridge and tunnel retail delivery fee in the manner prescribed by the
department in accordance with section 43-4-218 (6). For the purpose of
minimizing compliance costs for retailers and administrative costs for the
state, the department of revenue shall collect and administer the bridge
and tunnel retail delivery fee on behalf of the bridge enterprise in the
-31- HB26-1266

same manner in which it collects and administers the retail delivery fee
imposed by section 43-4-218 (3).
(II) For retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased
during state fiscal year 2022-23, the bridge enterprise shall impose the
bridge and tunnel retail delivery fee in a maximum amount of two and
seven-tenths cents.
(III) (A) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(5)(g.7)(III)(B) of this section, for retail deliveries of tangible personal
property purchased during state fiscal year 2023-24 or during any
subsequent state fiscal year, the bridge enterprise shall impose the bridge
and tunnel retail delivery fee in a maximum amount that is the maximum
amount for the prior state fiscal year adjusted for inflation. The bridge
enterprise shall notify the department of revenue of the amount of the
bridge and tunnel retail delivery fee to be collected for retail deliveries of
tangible personal property purchased during each state fiscal year no later
than March 15 of the calendar year in which the state fiscal year begins,
and the department of revenue shall publish the amount no later than
April15 of the calendar year in which the state fiscal year begins.
(B) The bridge enterprise is authorized to adjust the amount of the
bridge and tunnel retail delivery fee for retail deliveries of tangible
personal property purchased during a state fiscal year only if the
department of revenue adjusts the amount of the retail delivery fee
imposed by section 43-4-218 (3) for retail deliveries of tangible personal
property purchased during the state fiscal year.
(IV) As used in this subsection (5)(g.7):
(A) "Inflation" means the average annual percentage change in the
United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, consumer
-32- HB26-1266

price index for Denver-Aurora-Lakewood for all items and all urban
consumers, or its applicable predecessor or successor index, for the five
years ending on the last December 31 before a state fiscal year for which
an inflation adjustment to be made to the bridge and tunnel retail delivery
fee imposed pursuant to this subsection (5)(g.7) begins.
(B) "Retail delivery" has the same meaning as set forth in section
43-4-218 (2)(e).
(C) "Retailer" has the same meaning as set forth in section
39-26-102 (8).
(r) (I) To contract with the state to borrow money under the terms
of one or more loan contracts entered into by the state and the bridge
enterprise pursuant to subsection (5)(r)(III) of this section, to expend any
money borrowed from the state for the purpose of completing designated
bridge projects, preventative maintenance bridge projects, and tunnel
projects and for any other authorized purpose that constitutes the
construction, supervision, and maintenance of the public highways of this
state for purposes of section 18 of article X of the state constitution, and
to use revenue generated by any bridge safety surcharge OR bridge and
tunnel impact fee or bridge and tunnel retail delivery fee imposed
pursuant to subsection (5)(g) OR (5)(g.5) or (5)(g.7) of this section and
any other legally available money of the bridge enterprise to repay the
money borrowed and any other amounts payable under the terms of the
loan contract.
(III) (A) If the state treasurer receives a list from the governor
pursuant to subsection (5)(r)(II) of this section, the state, acting by and
through the state treasurer, may enter into a loan contract with the bridge
enterprise and may raise the money needed to make a loan pursuant to the
-33- HB26-1266

terms of the loan contract by selling or leasing one or more of the state
buildings or other state capital facilities on the list. The state treasurer
shall have sole discretion to enter into a loan contract on behalf of the
state and to determine the amount of a loan; except that the principal
amount of a loan shall not exceed the maximum amount specified by the
governor pursuant to subsection (5)(r)(II) of this section. The state
treasurer shall also have sole discretion to determine the timing of the
entry of the state into any loan contract or the sale or lease of one or more
state buildings or other state capital facilities. The loan contract shall
require the bridge enterprise to pledge to the state all or a portion of the
revenues of any bridge safety surcharge OR bridge and tunnel impact fee
or bridge and tunnel retail delivery fee imposed pursuant to subsection
(5)(g) OR (5)(g.5) or (5)(g.7) of this section for the repayment of the loan
and may also require the bridge enterprise to pledge to the state any other
legally available revenue of the bridge enterprise. Any loan contract
entered into by the state, acting by and through the state treasurer, and the
bridge enterprise pursuant to this subsection (5)(r)(III)(A) and any pledge
of revenue by the bridge enterprise pursuant to such a loan contract shall
be only for the benefit of, and enforceable only by, the state and the
bridge enterprise. Specifically, but without limiting the generality of said
limitation, no such loan contract or pledge shall be for the benefit of, or
enforceable by, a seller under a financed purchase of an asset or
certificate of participation agreement entered into pursuant to this
subsection (5)(r)(III), an owner of any instrument evidencing rights to
receive rentals or other payments made and to be made under such a
financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement as
authorized by subsection (5)(r)(IV)(B) of this section, a party to any
-34- HB26-1266

ancillary agreement or instrument entered into pursuant to subsection
(5)(r)(V) of this section, or a party to any interest rate exchange
agreement entered into pursuant to subsection (5)(r)(VII)(A) of this
section.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 43-4-1101, amend
(1) introductory portion as follows:
43-4-1101. Legislative declaration.
(1) The general assembly hereby finds and declares that it is
necessary, appropriate, and in the best interest of the state to use a portion
of the general fund money that is dedicated for transportation purposes
pursuant to section 24-75-219 to fund multimodal transportation projects
and operations throughout the state and to use a portion of the money that
is generated by the retail delivery fee imposed on the delivery of retail
goods transported to the delivery site by motor vehicle pursuant to section
43-4-218 (3) to fund transportation-related greenhouse gas mitigation
expenses throughout the state as authorized by this part 11 because, in
addition to the general benefits that it provides to all Coloradans, a
complete and integrated multimodal transportation system that includes
greenhouse gas mitigation projects and services:
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 43-4-1201, amend
(2)(g); and repeal (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(d), (1)(f), (2)(e) and (2)(f) as
follows:
43-4-1201. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
hereby finds and declares that:
(a) Retail deliveries are increasing and are expected to continue
to increase in communities across the state;
(b) The motor vehicles used to make retail deliveries are some of
-35- HB26-1266

the most polluting vehicles on the road, which has resulted in additional
and increasing air and greenhouse gas pollution;
(c) The adverse environmental and health impacts of increased
emissions from motor vehicles used to make retail deliveries can be
mitigated and offset by supporting the widespread adoption of electric
buses for transit fleets and reducing vehicle miles traveled by encouraging
people to choose clean, efficient, public transit options instead of personal
motor vehicle travel;
(d) Instead of reducing the impacts of retail deliveries by limiting
retail delivery activity through regulation, it is more appropriate to
continue to allow persons who receive retail deliveries to benefit from the
convenience afforded by unfettered retail deliveries and instead impose
a small fee on each retail delivery and use fee revenue to fund necessary
mitigation activities;
(f) By reducing motor vehicle emissions, transit fleet
electrification effectively remediates some of the impacts of retail
deliveries by offsetting a portion of the increased motor vehicle emissions
resulting from such deliveries.
(2) The general assembly further finds and declares that:
(e) Consistent with the determination of the Colorado supreme
court in Nicholl v. E-470 Public Highway Authority, 896 P.2d 859 (Colo.
1995), that the power to impose taxes is inconsistent with enterprise status
under section 20 of article X of the state constitution, it is the conclusion
of the general assembly that the revenue collected by the enterprise is
generated by fees, not taxes, because the clean transit retail delivery fee
imposed by the enterprise as authorized by section 43-4-1203 (7) and the
production fee for clean transit are:
-36- HB26-1266

(I) Imposed for the specific purpose of allowing the enterprise to
defray the costs of providing the remediation services specified in this
section, including mitigating impacts to air quality and greenhouse gas
emissions caused by the activities on which the fee is assessed, and
contributes to the implementation of the comprehensive regulatory
scheme required for the planning, funding, development, construction,
maintenance, and supervision of a sustainable transportation system
specified in this section; and
(II) Collected at rates that are reasonably calculated based on the
impacts caused by fee payers and the cost of remediating those impacts;
(f) So long as the enterprise qualifies as an enterprise for purposes
of section 20 of article X of the state constitution, the revenue from the
clean transit retail delivery fee collected by the enterprise is not state
fiscal year spending, as defined in section 24-77-102 (17), or state
revenues, as defined in section 24-77-103.6 (6)(c), and does not count
against either the state fiscal year spending limit imposed by section 20
of article X of the state constitution or the excess state revenues cap, as
defined in section 24-77-103.6 (6)(b)(I)(D); and
(g) The addition of the production fee for clean transit continues
to serve the enterprise's primary business purposes set forth in section
43-4-1203 (3)(a). If the addition COLLECTION of the production fee for
clean transit combined with the clean transit retail delivery fee THAT WAS
COLLECTED BY THE ENTERPRISE PRIOR TO THE REPEAL OF THAT FEE BY
THIS HOUSE BILL 26-____, ENACTED IN 2026, is estimated to result in the
collection of fees and surcharges that exceed one hundred million dollars
in the enterprise's first five fiscal years, the board shall adjust the fees
PRODUCTION FEE, lower the fees FEE, or stop collecting the fees FEE in
-37- HB26-1266

order to not collect fees or surcharges that exceed one hundred million
dollars in the enterprise's first five fiscal years, which five-year period, for
the purpose of section 24-77-108, ends on June 30, 2026. Therefore, the
enterprise, originally created in section 43-4-1203, is in compliance with
section 24-77-108.
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 43-4-1202, repeal
(11), (15), and (16), as follows:
43-4-1202. Definitions. As used in this part 12, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(11) "Inflation" means the average annual percentage change in
the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, consumer
price index for Denver-Aurora-Lakewood for all items and all urban
consumers, or its applicable predecessor or successor index, for the five
years ending on the last December 31 before a state fiscal year for which
an inflation adjustment to be made to the clean transit retail delivery fee
imposed pursuant to section 43-4-1203 (7) begins.
(15) "Retail delivery" has the same meaning as set forth in section
43-4-218 (2)(e).
(16) "Retailer" has the same meaning as set forth in section
39-26-102 (8).
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 43-4-1203, amend
(3)(a)(I), (5)(a), and (6)(g); and repeal (3)(b)(I) and (7) as follows:
43-4-1203. Clean transit enterprise - creation - board - powers
and duties - rules - fees - fund.
(3) (a) The primary business purposes of the enterprise are to:
(I) Reduce and mitigate the adverse environmental and health
impacts of air pollution and greenhouse gas emissions produced by motor
-38- HB26-1266

vehicles used to make retail deliveries by supporting the replacement of
existing gasoline and diesel transit vehicles with electric motor vehicles,
including motor vehicles that originally were powered exclusively by
internal combustion engines but have been converted into electric motor
vehicles; providing the associated charging infrastructure for electric
transit fleet motor vehicles; supporting facility modifications that allow
for the safe operation and maintenance of electric transit motor vehicles;
and funding planning studies that enable transit agencies to plan for
transit vehicle electrification; and
(b) To allow the enterprise to accomplish the business purposes
described in subsection (3)(a) of this section and fully exercise its powers
and duties through the board, the enterprise may:
(I) Impose a clean transit retail delivery fee as authorized by
subsection (7) of this section;
(5) (a) The clean transit enterprise fund is hereby created in the
state treasury. The fund consists of clean transit retail delivery fee
revenue credited to the fund pursuant to subsection (7) of this section, any
monetary gifts, grants, donations, or other money received by the
enterprise, any federal money that may be credited to the fund, and any
other money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the
fund. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from
the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund. Subject to
annual appropriation by the general assembly, the enterprise may expend
money from the fund to provide grants, pay its reasonable and necessary
operating expenses, including repayment of any loan received by the
enterprise pursuant to subsection (5)(b) of this section, and otherwise
exercise its powers and perform its duties as authorized by this part 3.
-39- HB26-1266

(6) In addition to any other powers and duties specified in this
section, the board has the following general powers and duties:
(g) To promulgate ADOPT rules to set the amount of the clean
transit retail delivery fee at or below the maximum amount authorized in
this section and to govern the process by which the enterprise accepts
applications for, awards, and oversees grants, loans, and rebates pursuant
to subsection (8) of this section; and
(7) (a) In furtherance of its business purpose, beginning in state
fiscal year 2022-23, the enterprise shall impose, and the department of
revenue shall collect on behalf of the enterprise, a clean transit retail
delivery fee on each retail delivery. Each retailer who makes a retail
delivery shall either collect and remit or elect to pay the clean transit retail
delivery fee in the manner prescribed by the department in accordance
with section 43-4-218 (6). For the purpose of minimizing compliance
costs for retailers and administrative costs for the state, the department of
revenue shall collect and administer the clean transit retail delivery fee on
behalf of the enterprise in the same manner in which it collects and
administers the retail delivery fee imposed by section 43-4-218 (3).
(b) For retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased
during state fiscal year 2022-23, the enterprise shall impose the clean
transit retail delivery fee in a maximum amount of three cents.
(c) (I) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7)(c)(II) of this
section, for retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased
during state fiscal year 2023-24 or during any subsequent state fiscal year,
the enterprise shall impose the clean transit retail delivery fee in a
maximum amount that is the maximum amount for the prior state fiscal
year adjusted for inflation. The enterprise shall notify the department of
-40- HB26-1266

revenue of the amount of the clean transit retail delivery fee to be
collected for retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased
during each state fiscal year no later than March 15 of the calendar year
in which the state fiscal year begins, and the department of revenue shall
publish the amount no later than April 15 of the calendar year in which
the state fiscal year begins.
(II) The enterprise is authorized to adjust the amount of the clean
transit retail delivery fee for retail deliveries of tangible personal property
purchased during a state fiscal year only if the department of revenue
adjusts the amount of the retail delivery fee imposed by section 43-4-218
(3) for retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased during the
state fiscal year.
SECTION 17. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 43-4-1302, amend
(15); and repeal (19), (20), and (23) as follows:
43-4-1302. Definitions. As used in this part 13, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(15) "Inflation" means the average annual percentage change in
the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, consumer
price index for Denver-Aurora-Lakewood for all items and all urban
consumers, or its applicable predecessor or successor index, for the five
years ending on the last December 31 before a state fiscal year for which
an inflation adjustment to be made to the air pollution mitigation per ride
fee imposed by section 43-4-1303 (7) or the air pollution mitigation retail
delivery fee imposed by section 43-4-1303 (8) begins.
(19) "Retail delivery" has the same meaning as set forth in section
43-4-218 (2)(e).
(20) "Retailer" has the same meaning as set forth in section
-41- HB26-1266

39-26-102 (8).
(23) "Tangible personal property has the same meaning as set
forth in section 39-26-102 (15).
SECTION 18. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 43-4-1303, amend
(3) introductory portion, (3)(a), (5)(a), and (6)(h); and repeal (8) as
follows:
43-4-1303. Nonattainment area air pollution mitigation
enterprise - creation - board - powers and duties - rules - fees - fund.
(3) The business purpose of the enterprise is to mitigate the
environmental and health impacts of increased air pollution from motor
vehicle emissions in nonattainment areas that results from the rapid and
continuing growth in retail deliveries made by motor vehicles and in
prearranged rides provided by transportation network companies by
providing funding for eligible projects that reduce traffic, including
demand management projects that encourage alternatives to driving alone
or that directly reduce air pollution, such as retrofitting of construction
equipment, construction of roadside vegetation barriers, and planting trees
along medians. To allow the enterprise to accomplish this purpose and
fully exercise its powers and duties through the board, the enterprise may:
(a) Impose an air pollution mitigation per ride fee and an air
pollution mitigation retail delivery fee as authorized by subsections (7)
and (8) SUBSECTION (7) of this section;
(5) (a) The nonattainment area air pollution mitigation enterprise
fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of air
pollution mitigation per ride fee revenue and air pollution mitigation retail
delivery fee revenue credited to the fund pursuant to subsections (7) and
(8) SUBSECTION (7) of this section, any monetary gifts, grants, donations,
-42- HB26-1266

or other payments received by the enterprise, any federal money that may
be credited to the fund, and any other money that the general assembly
may appropriate or transfer to the fund. The state treasurer shall credit all
interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in
the fund to the fund. Money in the fund is continuously appropriated to
the enterprise for the purposes set forth in this part 13 and to pay the
enterprise's reasonable and necessary operating expenses, including the
repayment of any loan received pursuant to subsection (5)(b) of this
section.
(6) In addition to any other powers and duties specified in this
section, the board has the following general powers and duties:
(h) To promulgate ADOPT rules for the sole purpose of setting the
amounts AMOUNT of the air pollution mitigation per ride fee and the air
pollution mitigation retail delivery fee at or below the maximum amounts
authorized in this section; and
(8) (a) In furtherance of its business purpose, beginning in state
fiscal year 2022-23, the enterprise shall impose, and the department of
revenue shall collect on behalf of the enterprise, an air pollution
mitigation retail delivery fee on each retail delivery. Each retailer who
makes a retail delivery shall either collect and remit or elect to pay the air
pollution mitigation retail delivery fee in the manner prescribed by the
department in accordance with section 43-4-218 (6). For the purpose of
minimizing compliance costs for retailers and administrative costs for the
state, the department of revenue shall collect and administer the air
pollution mitigation retail delivery fee on behalf of the enterprise in the
same manner in which it collects and administers the retail delivery fee
imposed by section 43-4-218 (3).
-43- HB26-1266

(b) For retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased
during state fiscal year 2022-23, the enterprise shall impose the air
pollution mitigation retail delivery fee in a maximum amount of
seven-tenths of one cent.
(c) (I) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (8)(c)(II) of this
section, for retail deliveries of tangible personal property purchased
during state fiscal year 2023-24 or during any subsequent state fiscal year,
the enterprise shall impose the air pollution mitigation retail delivery fee
in a maximum amount that is the maximum amount for the prior state
fiscal year adjusted for inflation. The enterprise shall notify the
department of revenue of the amount of the air pollution mitigation retail
delivery fee to be collected for retail deliveries of tangible personal
property purchased during each state fiscal year no later than March 15
of the calendar year in which the state fiscal year begins, and the
department of revenue shall publish the amount no later than April15 of
the calendar year in which the state fiscal year begins.
(II) The enterprise is authorized to adjust the amount of the air
pollution mitigation retail delivery fee for retail deliveries of tangible
personal property purchased during a state fiscal year only if the
department of revenue adjusts the amount of the retail delivery fee
imposed by section 43-4-218 (3) for retail deliveries of tangible personal
property purchased during the state fiscal year.
SECTION 19. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-37-103, repeal
(15)(a)(IV) as follows:
39-37-103. Definitions. As used in this article 37, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(15) (a) "Purchase price" means the aggregate consideration
-44- HB26-1266

valued in money paid or delivered or promised to be paid or delivered by
the user or consumer in consummation of a sale, exclusive of:
(IV) Any retail delivery fee and enterprise retail delivery fees
imposed or collected as specified in section 43-4-218;
SECTION 20. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 43-4-1103, amend
(1)(a), (2)(d)(I), and (2)(d)(II) as follows:
43-4-1103. Multimodal transportation options fund - creation
- revenue sources for fund - use of fund.
(1) (a) The multimodal transportation and mitigation options fund
is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of money
transferred from the general fund to the fund pursuant to section
24-75-219 retail delivery fee revenue credited to the fund pursuant to
section 43-4-218 (5)(a)(II), and any other money that the general
assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund. The state treasurer shall
credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of
money in the fund to the fund.
(2) (d) (I) On and after October 1, 2022, unless the department has
both adopted implementing guidelines and procedures that satisfy the
requirements of section 43-1-128 (3) and updated its ten-year vision plan
to comply with the implementing guidelines and procedures, expenditures
from the funds made available for multimodal projects pursuant to
sections 24-75-219 (7)(c)(I) and (7)(f)(II) and 43-4-218 (5)(a)(II) for state
multimodal projects shall only be made for multimodal projects that the
department, in consultation with the department of public health and
environment, determines will help bring the ten-year vision plan into
compliance with the requirements of section 43-1-128 (3).
(II) On and after October 1, 2022, unless the department has
-45- HB26-1266

adopted implementing guidelines and procedures that satisfy the
requirements of section 43-1-128 (3) and a metropolitan planning
organization that is in an area or includes an area that has been out of
attainment for national ambient air quality standards for ozone for two
years or more has updated its regional transportation plan to comply with
the implementing guidelines and procedures, expenditures from the funds
made available for multimodal projects pursuant to sections 24-75-219
(7)(c)(I) and (7)(f)(II) and 43-4-218 (5)(a)(II) for local multimodal
projects within the territory of the metropolitan planning organization
shall only be made for multimodal projects that the department, in
consultation with the department of public health and environment,
determines will help bring the regional transportation plan into
compliance with the requirements of section 43-1-128 (3).
SECTION 21. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly; except
that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V
of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this
act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take
effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-46- HB26-1266